California, session 20252026, AB1619.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 22223 of the Education Code is amended to read:22223. The members of the board who are not active members of the Defined Benefit Program or active participants of the Cash Balance Benefit Program and who are appointed by the Governor pursuant to Section 22200 shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) three hundred twenty dollars ($320) for every day of actual attendance at meetings of the board or any meeting of any committee of the board of which the person is a member, and that is conducted for the purpose of carrying out the powers and duties of the board, together with their necessary traveling expenses incurred in connection with performance of their official duties.SEC. 2. Section 20091 of the Government Code is amended to read:20091. The members of the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 20090, the public member appointed jointly by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 20090, and any retired person serving on the board pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 20090 shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) three hundred twenty dollars ($320) for every day or portion thereof of actual attendance at meetings of the board or any meeting of any committee of the board of which committee the person is a member and which meeting is conducted for the purpose of carrying out the powers and duties of the board, together with their necessary traveling expenses incurred in connection with performance of their official duties.SECTION 1.SEC. 3. Section 31521 of the Government Code is amended to read:31521. (a) The board of supervisors may provide that the fourth and fifth members, and in counties having a board consisting of nine members or nine members and an alternate retired member, the fourth, fifth, sixth, eighth, ninth, and alternate retired members, and in counties having a board of investments under Section 31520.2, the fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, and ninth members of the board of investments, shall receive compensation at a rate of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for a meeting, or for a meeting of a committee authorized by the board, for not more than five meetings per month, together with actual and necessary expenses for all members of the board.(b) The compensation rate established by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) may be increased by the board of retirement to a rate of not more than three hundred twenty dollars ($320). This subdivision shall not be operative in any county until it is publicly noticed and adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors. supervisors, and shall not be adopted by a consent calendar.SEC. 4. Section 31521.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:31521.1. (a) The board of supervisors may provide that in counties having a board consisting of nine members and an alternate retired member, the fourth, fifth, sixth, eighth, ninth, and alternate retired members, and in counties having a board of investments under Section 31520.2, the fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth, and ninth members of the board of investments, shall receive compensation at a rate of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for a meeting, or for a meeting of a committee authorized by the board, for not more than five meetings per month, together with actual and necessary expenses for all members of the board.(b) The compensation rate established by the board of supervisors pursuant to subdivision (a) may be increased by the board of retirement or board of investments to a rate of not more than three hundred twenty dollars ($320). This subdivision shall not become operative until it is publicly noticed and adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors, and shall not be adopted by a consent calendar.(b)(c) This section shall apply only in a county of the first class, as defined by Section 28020, as amended by Chapter 1204 of the Statutes of 1971, and Section 28022, as amended by Chapter 43 of the Statutes of 1961.